Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2108
Certified master social worker, defined.

Certified master social worker means a person who meets the standards established in subsection (1) of section 38-2128 and who holds a current certificate issued by the department.

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 71-1,251;

Laws 1993, LB 669, § 20;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,301;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 727.